District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Food Policy Council Procurement Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Food Policy Council and Director Establishment Act of 2014, effective
March 10, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-191; D.C. Official Code § 48-311 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 48-311) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is redesignated as paragraph (1A).
(2) A new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:
“(1) “Covered agency” means a District agency or agency contractor that
regularly procures food or beverages. The term “covered agency” shall not include a District
agency or agency contractor that procures food or beverages solely for vending machines or one-
off catering services for events.”.
(b) Section 3(c) (D.C. Official Code § 48-312(c)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Beginning September 30, 2027, and every 3 years thereafter, the Food Policy
Council shall provide a report to the Council on the state of the local food system across the
District. The report shall assess District food access, including an identification of low food
access areas, and the state of the local food economy, and provide policy recommendations to
improve the local food economy and food access, including priorities for local investments.”.
(c) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 48-314) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place;
(B) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
1

(C) A new paragraph (7) is added to read as follows:
“(7) Oversee efforts to improve the quality of food purchased by covered agencies
and to ensure food procured by covered agencies aligns with District requirements, standards,
and goals regarding nutrition, the local economy, and environmental sustainability.”.
(2) New subsections (c) and (d) are added to read as follows:
“(c) To achieve the objectives set forth under subsection (b)(7) of this section, the Office
shall:
“(1) Advise covered agencies on developing solicitations and contracts that:
“(A) Align with District laws, standards, and goals regarding nutrition, the
local economy, and environmental sustainability; and
“(B) Require vendors to regularly report on purchased food products to
enable assessment of compliance with purchasing goals;
“(2) Collaborate with the Office of Contracting and Procurement to ensure that
food service solicitations reach a wide audience of high-quality prospective vendors, including
both for-profit and non-profit vendors;
“(3) Serve on evaluation panels to contribute industry and food sector subject
matter expertise in procurement determinations;
“(4) Consolidate food purchasing data from all covered agencies to track District-
wide performance on District laws, standards, and goals for food procurement; and
“(5) Develop and maintain food procurement standards, practices, and templates
to be used in all procurements, in collaboration with the Department of Health, Department of
Small and Local Business Development, Department of Energy and the Environment, and Office
of Contracting and Procurement.
“(d) All covered agencies and the Office of Contracting and Procurement shall provide
all data regarding food procurement to the Office that are necessary for the Office to fulfill its
functions under subsection (c) of this section.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
2

as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3